New York, session 2025-2026, S8158.
do enact as follows:
1 Section 1. Paragraph 3 of subdivision e of section 556 of the retire-
2 ment and social security law, as added by chapter 165 of the laws of
3 1995, is amended to read as follows:
4 3. A pension of [two-thirds] three-quarters of [his or her] the
5 member's final average salary. The payment of such pension shall be
6 subject to the provisions of section [three hundred] sixty-four of this
7 chapter.
8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.
FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50:
This bill will increase the accidental disability retirement benefit
for deputy sheriffs covered under Article 14-B of the Retirement and
Social Security Law (RSSL). The proposed benefit is 75% of final average
salary (FAS) minus Workers' Compensation. The current benefit is two-
thirds of FAS minus Workers' Compensation.
Insofar as this bill affects the New York State and Local Employees'
Retirement System (NYSLERS), accrued benefits would increase by approxi-
mately $5.6 million.
Benefit improvements would be funded by increasing the billing rates
charged annually. The annual contribution required by all participating
employers in NYSLERS would increase 0.02% of billable salary, or approx-
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD01325-05-6

S. 8158--B 2
imately $280,000 to the state of New York and $420,000 to the local
participating employers.
Additionally, there would be a cost for future service accruals which
would increase the annual billing rates for RSSL sections 551, 552, and
553 by 0.3% of salary.
Employer costs would vary according to their plan coverage and salary
reported in RSSL sections 551, 552, and 553.
These estimated costs are based on 3,116 affected members, with annual
salary of approximately $328 million as of March 31, 2025.
Summary of relevant resources:
Membership data as of March 31, 2025 was used to measure the impact of
the bill, the same data used in the Actuarial Valuations dated April 1,
2025. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2025 Report
of the Actuary and the 2025 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The
actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2025 Annual
Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules
and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The fair
value of assets and GASB disclosures can be found in the 2025 Financial
Statements and Supplementary Information.
Assumptions, demographics, and other considerations may have been
modified to better reflect specific provisions of any proposed benefit
change(s).
This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability
of the bill, nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the profes-
sional judgment of an attorney.
This estimate, dated January 12, 2026, and intended for use only
during the 2026 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note Number 2026-30. As
Chief Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System
(NYSLRS), I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis
complies with applicable Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the
Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries
Issuing Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actu-
aries, of which I am a member. I am a member of NYSLRS but do not
believe it impairs my objectivity.